Utah statutes.
13-28-3.   Notice requirement.

If a solicitor represents to an individual that he has been selected or may be eligible to receive a prize, the solicitor may not request, and the solicitor or sponsor may not accept, a payment from the individual in any form before the individual receives a written prize notice that contains all of the information required under Subsection 13-28-4(1) presented in the manner required under Subsections 13-28-4(2) through (6).



Amended by Chapter 131, 2003 General Session

